Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2665.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:(1) A person or entity purchasing real property with the intent to use the property as a less restrictive alternative under this chapter shall provide written notification to the following:(a) The sheriff of the county where the property is located;(b) The senator and each representative of the legislative district in which the property is located;(c) The administrator or manager of the county in which the property is located; and(d) The chair of the board of county commissioners or county council, whichever is applicable, of the county in which the property is located.(2) The written notification provided under this section must include:(a) The date on which the purchaser plans to begin using the property as a less restrictive alternative;(b) The maximum number of sexually violent predators that may reside in the less restrictive alternative at one time; and(c) The names of any sexually violent predators who the purchaser anticipates will reside in the less restrictive alternative, if known at the time the written notification is made.(3) The purchaser must make the written notification required by this section after entering escrow, but before the sale is closed.(4) Violation of this section is a class 1 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW.--- END ---